en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Camping Tools > Hunting & Survival Knives: Fixed Blade Knives; Locking Blade Knives; Machetes; Peasant Knives; Slip Joint Knives
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Retkityökalut > Metsästys- ja selviytymisveitset: Kiinteäteräiset veitset; Lukittuvat veitset; Viidakkoveitset; Puukot; Kääntöveitset
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Ferramentas de campismo > Facas de caça e sobrevivência: Facas de lâmina fixa; Navalha; Catanas; Facas camponesas; Facas dobráveis
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Narzędzia kempingowe > Noże myśliwskie i survivalowe: Noże ze stałym ostrzem; Noże z blokadą ostrza; Maczety; Noże składane; Scyzoryki
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Kempingszerszámok > Vadász- és túlélőkések: Fix pengés kések; Zárt pengéjű kések; Macheték; Parasztkések; Csúszózáras kések
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Campinghilfsmittel > Jagdmesser: Messer mit feststehender Klinge; Klappmesser; Macheten; Bauernmesser; Slipjoint-Messer
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Dụng cụ cắm trại > Dao cắm trại: Dao lưỡi cố định; Dao có lưỡi khóa; Dao quắm; Dao nông dân; Dao gấp
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Herramientas de camping > Cuchillos de caza: Cuchillos de hoja fija; Cuchillos con hoja de bloqueo; Machetes; Cuchillos campesinos; Cuchillos de junta deslizante
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > เครื่องมือสำหรับการตั้งแคมป์ > มีดสำหรับล่าและยังชีพ: มีดใบตาย; มีดล็อคใบมีด; มีดมาเชเต้; มีดพับชาวนา; มีดเลื่อนข้อต่อ
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Campingredskaber > Jagtknive og overlevelsesknive: Knive med fast blad; Låseknive; Macheter; Bondeknive; Ledknive
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Къмпинг инструменти > Ножове за лов и оцеляване: Ножове с фиксирано острие; Сгъваеми ножове със заключващо се острие; Мачете; Сгъваеми ножове с незаключващо се острие; Сгъваеми ножове с пружина
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Kempinkové vybavení > Lovecké nože: Nože s pevnou čepelí; Zavírací nože; Mačety; Kapesní nože; Nože se slipjoint pojistkou
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > キャンプ用品 > サバイバルナイフ: フィクスドブレードナイフ; 折りたたみナイフ; マチェーテ; ペザントナイフ; スリップジョイントナイフ
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Campingverktøy > Jakt- og overlevelseskniver: Kniver med fast blad; Kniver med låseblad; Macheter; Bondekniver; Sklileddkniver
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Инструменты для походов и кемпинга > Охотничьи ножи и ножи для выживания: Ножи с фиксированным клинком; Ножи с замком для клинка; Мачете; Ножи с фрикционной фиксацией; Ножи с механизмом слип-джойнт
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Kampçılık Aletleri > Av ve Hayat İdame Bıçakları: Sabit namlulu bıçaklar; Kilitli Bıçaklar; Palalar; Köylü Bıçakları; Ayarlı Bıçaklar
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Kampeerartikelen > Jachtmessen: Messen met vast lemmet; Messen met vergrendelbare bladen; Machetes; Boerenmessen; Scharniermessen
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Campingutrustning > Jakt- och överlevnadsknivar: Knivar med fast blad; Låsande knivar; Machetes; Moraknivar; Fällknivar
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Εργαλεία κατασκήνωσης > Μαχαίρια επιβίωσης: Μαχαίρια σταθερής λεπίδας; Μαχαίρια με κλείδωμα; Ματσέτες; Μαχαίρια αγροτών; Μαχαίρια με αρθρώσεις
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Orodja za kampiranje > Noži za lov in preživetje v naravi: Noži s fiksnim rezilom; Noži z zaklepnim rezilom; Mačete; Žepni noži; Žepni noži s pomičnim mehanizmom
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 野营工具 > 猎刀: 直柄刀; 锁刃刀; 开山刀; 农用刀; 滑动接头刀
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Alati za kampiranje > Noževi za lov i preživljavanje: Noževi s fiksnom oštricom; Preklopni noževi; Mačete; Sklopivi noževi; Džepni noževi
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Unelte pentru camping > Cuțite de vânătoare și de supraviețuire: Cuțite cu lamă fixă; Cuțite cu lamă blocabilă; Macete; Cuțite pliabile simple; Cuțite pliabile
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Strumenti da campeggio > Coltelli da caccia: Coltelli a lama fissa; Coltelli a lama bloccabile; Machete; Coltelli contadini; Coltelli con giunto scorrevole
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Kempingové nástroje > Lovecké nože a nože na prežitie: Nože s pevnou čepeľou; Nože s uzamykacou čepeľou; Mačety; Sedliacke nože; Nože s pohyblivým kĺbom
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 캠핑 도구 > 사냥/서바이벌 나이프: 픽스드 블레이드 나이프; 잠금식 나이프; 마체테; 피전트 접이식 나이프; 슬립 조인트 접이식 나이프
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Outils de camping > Couteaux de chasse: Couteaux à lame fixe; Couteau à lame verrouillable; Machettes; Couteaux de poche; Couteaux à joint coulissant
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Ferramentas para camping > Facas de caça e sobrevivência: Facas de lâmina fixa; Canivetes de lâmina com trava; Facões; Facas campeiras; Canivetes dobráveis
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 露營工具 > 狩獵/野外求生刀: 直刀; 安全折刀; 開山刀; 農刀; 滑口刀
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Stovyklavimo įrankiai > Medžioklės ir išgyvenimo peiliai: Peiliai fiksuotais ašmenimis; Peiliai fiksuojama geležte; Mačetės; Kišeniniai peiliai; Lenktiniai peiliai nefiksuojama geležte